Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5941.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 28 of the General Laws entitled "LABOR AND LABOR RELATIONS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 61
PORTABLE BENEFIT PLAN
28-61-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meaning ascribed to them in this
section, except when the context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) "Hiring party" means a person who hires or enters into a contract with an independent
contractor.
(2) "Independent contractor" means any person determined to be an independent contractor
pursuant to the provisions of § 28-42-7.
(3) "Portable benefit plan" means a group that offers an insurance product regulated by title
27 (“insurance”), or chapters 42 through 44 of title 28 (“employment security”) and is assigned to
an individual beneficiary and is not associated with a specific employer or hiring party.
28-61-2. Administration -- Assignment of benefits -- Portability.
(a) A governmental entity or private entity voluntarily may offer a portable benefit plan.
(b) Contributions to a portable benefit plan shall be voluntary and may not be used as a
criterion for determining a person's employment classification.
(c) A portable benefit plan for the benefit of an individual beneficiary shall not be construed

as evidence of employer liability, and a court may not construe the contribution as an element of
an employment relationship for purposes of employer lability to include, but not be limited to, the
provisions of workers’ compensation, employment security or the provisions of title 28.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002302
========
LC002302 - Page 2 of 3